North Carolina statutes. Chapter 111. Aid to the Blind.
Article 4. Operation of Highway Vending Facilities on North Carolina Highways.

§ 111-48.
Preference to blind persons in operation of highway vending facilities.

In order to provide support for programs for the blind and to further promote employment opportunities for blind persons, the Department of Health and Human Services may operate automatic vending machines on State property on North Carolina highways and shall give preference to blind persons in the operation of these facilities.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 111-49.
Definitions as used in this Article.

“Automatic vending” means a coin, currency, token, ticket, or credit card operated machine that dispenses food, drinks, or sundries.

“Blind vendor” means a blind person who has been licensed by the Division of Services for the Blind to operate a vending stand in a public building.

“Highway vending facilities” means automatic vending operations located on North Carolina highways in Welcome Centers and rest areas designated by the State.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 3; 2000-121, s. 26.

§ 111-50.
Operations of highway vending.

In locations on North Carolina highways where the Department of Health and Human Services determines that automatic vending is suitable, the Department shall authorize the Division of Services for the Blind to contract with blind vendors in the operation of highway vending facilities. The contracts shall be reviewed and renegotiated by the Division every two years and shall be reviewed by the Transfer and Promotion Committee. The Commission for the Blind shall adopt rules necessary to govern the operations. The highway vending program shall be a part of the Business Enterprises Program operated under the Randolph-Sheppard Act, 20 U.S.C. § 107a.

Repealed by Session Laws 2000, c. 121, s. 27, effective July 14, 2000.

The Commission for the Blind may adopt rules to establish applicable set-aside rates for the Business Enterprises Program. The Commission shall only develop rules authorized by this subsection with the active participation of the Elected Committee of Vendors.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2000-121, s. 27.

§ 111-51.
Priority for specific blind vendors.

Blind vendors who were operating highway vending facilities as of July 31, 1991, and who continue to operate those facilities shall be given priority in renegotiating contracts under this Article to continue to operate those same facilities.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 3.

§ 111-52.
Profits from Highway Vending Fund.

Profits generated by highway vending locations as of June 30, 1992, and deposited in a special fund in accordance with the policies of the Office of the State Controller shall be reserved for the construction and maintenance of highway vending facility projects.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 984, s. 3; 2004-199, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-199, s. 2, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “policies of the Office of the State Controller” for “Administrative Policies and Procedures Manual of the State Controller.”